District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Contract No. DCCB-2025-F-0003 with Edelson PC Approval and
Payment Authorization Emergency Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the
requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02), the Council approves multiyear
Contract No. DCCB-2025-F-0003 with Edelson PC to provide legal services to assist the Public
Advocacy Division of the Office of the Attorney General with an investigation of and potential
litigation against identified targets for violations of law related to past marketing, selling, and
installation of lead water pipes, and authorizes payment in the not-to-exceed amount of $85
million for services received and to be received under the contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement provided by the Chief Financial Officer as
the fiscal impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of
1975, approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
longer than 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in
Section 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87
Stat. 788; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia